Wisconsin, session 2025, AB412.
do enact as follows:AB412,11Section 1. 48.981 (2) (a) 10. of the statutes is amended to read:AB412,2,2248.981 (2) (a) 10. A social worker, as defined in s. 457.01 (10).AB412,23Section 2. 48.981 (2) (a) 31. of the statutes is created to read:AB412,2,5448.981 (2) (a) 31. An employee of an agency whose duties include direct 5interaction with children or the handling of child welfare cases.AB412,36Section 3. 48.981 (3) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:AB412,2,15748.981 (3) (a) 3. Except as provided in sub. (3m), a county department, the 8department, or a licensed child welfare agency under contract with the department 9shall within 12 hours, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, or legal holidays, refer to 10the sheriff or police department all cases of suspected or threatened abuse, as 11defined in s. 48.02 (1) (b) to (f), reported to it. For cases of suspected or threatened 12abuse, as defined in s. 48.02 (1) (a), (am), (g), or (gm), or neglect, each county 13department, the department, and a licensed child welfare agency under contract 14with the department shall adopt a written policy specifying the kinds of reports it 15will routinely report to local law enforcement authorities.AB412,2,1616